South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3347.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 31 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 31-3-60. Any part-time or full-time maintenance personnel hired to work for a public housing authority in this State must have a valid license or certification in the area in which they are hired to perform work for the public housing authority. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----